Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1596
Spent nuclear fuel, defined.

Spent nuclear fuel shall mean irradiated nuclear fuel that has undergone at least one year of decay since being used as a source of energy in a power reactor. Spent fuel shall include the special nuclear material, byproduct material, source material, and other radioactive material associated with fuel assemblies.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 19.